Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4642
Contract authorized.

If the utility seeks to pursue a qualifying project as specified in section 19-4641, it may negotiate a contract with the city in which the city, in consideration of the utility's promise to provide, expand, or improve natural gas service to the citizens of the city at reasonable rates, with safeguards for public health and safety, and with appropriate standards for service, agrees to relinquish its right to condemn the gas system for a period of time sufficient to enable the utility to recover the reasonable costs of the project, but not to exceed such period.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 19.